Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-736
Unique identifier; use.

The unique identifier of any licensee shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations, or advertisements, including business cards or websites, and any other documents as established by rule, regulation, or order of the director.

Laws 2009, LB328, § 21;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 18;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 34.